Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1083
School tax; adopted budget statement; delivery; to whom.

At the time the budget statement is certified to the levying board, each school board shall deliver to the county clerk of the headquarters county a copy of its adopted budget statement. If the school district is a member of a learning community, the school board shall also deliver to the learning community coordinating council a copy of the adopted budget statement for school fiscal years prior to school fiscal year 2017-18.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision V, § 2, p. 352;

Laws 1889, c. 78, § 14, p. 549;

R.S.1913, § 6782;

C.S.1922, § 6323;

C.S.1929, § 79-502;

R.S.1943, § 79-502;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 74, p. 717;

Laws 1955, c. 312, § 2, p. 964;

Laws 1969, c. 714, § 1, p. 2740;

Laws 1969, c. 50, § 3, p. 270;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 43, p. 699;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-435;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 729;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 110;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 97;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 50.

Board of equalization determines amount of levy necessary to raise funds requested by school district in budget. State ex rel. School Dist. of City of Grand Island v. Board of Equalization, 166 Neb. 785, 90 N.W.2d 421 (1958).

Mandamus will lie to compel moderator to sign report. State ex rel. Percival v. Studheit, 11 Neb. 359, 9 N.W. 559 (1881).

Taxes should be levied upon district as it existed at time of levy, not at time of vote. School Dist. No. 9 of Hamilton County v. School Dist. No. 6 of Hamilton County, 9 Neb. 331, 2 N.W. 712 (1879).